Montana, session 2025, HB429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 4] may be cited as the "Inflation
Protection Act of 2025".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 4], unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Digital asset" means virtual currencies, cryptocurrencies, native electronic assets, including
stablecoins and nonfungible tokens, and other digital-only assets that confer economic, proprietary, or access
rights or powers.
(2) "Exchange-traded product" means a financial instrument that is approved by the securities and
exchange commission, the commodities future trading commission, or the state securities commissioner that is
traded on an American regulated exchange and derives its value from an underlying pool of assets, such as
stocks, bonds, commodities, or indexes.
(3) "Precious metal" means the following, whether in coin, bullion, or other form:
(a) silver;
(b) gold; and
(c) platinum.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 429

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0429.2
(4) "Qualified Custodian" means a federal or state-chartered bank, trust company, or special
purpose depository institution or a company regulated by the state that provides custody for digital assets for an
approved exchange-traded product.
(5) (4) "Stablecoin" means a digital asset that is used by a corporation backed by dollars or high-
quality liquid assets and is redeemable on demand by the holder in part for a fixed monetary value in equivalent
Unites States dollars.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Inflation Protection Act state special revenue account. (1) There is
an Inflation Protection Act state special revenue account within the state special revenue fund provided for in
17-2-102 that must be invested by the board as part of the unified investment program.
(2) The account is funded by legislative transfers and is subject to legislative transfers.
(3) Any proceeds from the investment of funds in this account must remain in the account.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Authorized holding of funds. The board of investments is authorized to
invest the funds in the account provided for in [section 3] in precious metals, digital assets with a market cap of
over $750 billion averaged over the previous calendar year, and stablecoins. These funds must be held by a
qualified custodian or through an exchange-traded fund.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Transfer of funds. By July 15, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer up
to $50 million from the general fund to the account provided for in [section 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 4] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 17, chapter 1, and the provisions of Title 17, chapter 1, apply to [sections 1
through 4].

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 429